Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.113

Public safety employees' retirement system—Election—Membership.

(1) An employee who was a member of the public employees' retirement system plan 2 or plan 3 before July 1, 2006, and on July 1, 2006, is employed by an employer as defined in *RCW 41.37.010(4) and is an employee in a job class included in *RCW 41.37.010(5), has the following options during the election period:

(a) Remain a member of the public employees' retirement system; or

(b) Become a member of the public safety employees' retirement system plan 2. All members will be dual members as provided in chapter 41.54 RCW, and public employees' retirement system service credit may not be transferred to the public safety employees' retirement system plan 2.

(2) The "election period" is the period between July 1, 2006, and September 30, 2006.

(3) During the election period, employees remain members of the public employees' retirement system plan 2 or plan 3 until they elect to join the public safety employees' retirement system. Members who elect to join the public safety employees' retirement system as described in subsection (1) of this section will have their membership begin prospectively from the date of their election.

(4) If after September 30, 2006, the member has not made an election to join the public safety employees' retirement system he or she will remain in the public employees' retirement system plan 2 or plan 3.

(5) An employee who was a member of the public employees' retirement system plan 1 on or before July 1, 2006, and on or after July 1, 2006, is employed by an employer as defined in *RCW 41.37.010(4) as an employee in a job class included in *RCW 41.37.010(5), shall remain a member of the public employees' retirement system plan 1.

(6) All new employees hired on or after July 1, 2006, who become employed by an employer as defined in *RCW 41.37.010(4) as an employee in a job class included in *RCW 41.37.010(5) will become members of the public safety employees' retirement system.

(7) An employee of the department of natural resources who was a member of the public employees' retirement system plan 2 or plan 3 before July 1, 2007, and on July 1, 2007, is performing the duties as defined in *RCW 41.37.010(5), has the following options during the election period defined in subsection (8) of this section:

(a) Remain in the public employees' retirement system; or

(b) Become a member of the public safety employees' retirement system plan 2 and be a dual member as provided in chapter 41.54 RCW, and public employees' retirement system service credit may not be transferred to the public safety employees' retirement system.

(8) The "election period" is the period between July 1, 2007, and September 30, 2007.

(9) During the election period, department of natural resources employees remain members of the public employees' retirement system plan 2 or plan 3 until they elect to join the public safety employees' retirement system. Members who elect to join the public safety employees' retirement system as described in subsection (7) of this section will have their membership begin prospectively from the date of their election.

(10) If after September 30, 2007, an employee has not made an election to join the public safety employees' retirement system, he or she will remain in the public employees' retirement system plan 2 or plan 3.

[ 2007 c 294 s 2; 2004 c 242 s 5.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 41.37.010 was alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k), changing subsections (4) and (5) to subsections (12) and (19), respectively.

Effective date—2004 c 242: See RCW 41.37.901.